Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.070

Court authority for certain functions of arbitration assistance and supervision.

(1) The functions referred to in RCW 7.05.120 (3) and (4), 7.05.140(3), 7.05.150, 7.05.170(3), and 7.05.450(2) shall be performed by the superior court of the county in which the agreement to arbitrate is to be performed or was made.

(2) If the arbitration agreement does not specify a county where the agreement to arbitrate is to be performed and the agreement was not made in any county in the state of Washington, the functions referred to in RCW 7.05.120 (3) and (4), 7.05.140(3), 7.05.150, 7.05.170(3), and 7.05.450(2) shall be performed in the county where any party to the court proceeding resides or has a place of business.

(3) In any case not covered by subsections (1) or (2) of this section, the functions referred to in RCW 7.05.120 (3) and (4), 7.05.140(3), 7.05.150, 7.05.170(3), and 7.05.450(2) shall be performed in any county in the state of Washington.

[ 2015 c 276 s 7.]